Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-525
Enterprise project; legislative findings.

In addition to the findings in section 86-513, the Legislature also finds that:

(1) The effective, efficient, and cost-effective operation of state government requires that information be considered and managed as a strategic resource;

(2) Information technologies present numerous opportunities to more effectively manage the information necessary for state government operations;

(3) Information technologies are changing and advancing at a very rapid rate, increasing the computing power available to individual users;

(4) The commission should have the responsibility to establish goals, guidelines, and priorities for information technology infrastructure; and

(5) Periodic investments in the information technology infrastructure are required to develop and maintain the foundation for the effective use of information technologies throughout state government.

Laws 1996, LB 1190, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 1349, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 81-1192;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 295.